Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4609
Filing of complaint; effect.

The filing of a complaint shall not preclude the complainant from pursuing any other remedy available to the complainant under the Erosion and Sediment Control Act, other law, or equity.

Laws 1986, LB 474, § 9.